Tennessee statutes. Title 6 Cities And Towns
Part 2

Abolition of Charter

6-52-201. Petition for abolition.

The people of any incorporated municipality, which was chartered or incorporated under the general laws providing for the organization of municipal corporations, who desire to surrender or abolish their charter, may do so in the following manner:

Whenever ten percent (10%) or more of the registered voters of any such town or city shall petition the county election commission of the county in which the town or city is located, setting forth in the petition that they desire and pray that an election be held of the qualified voters of the town or city, submitting to them the question of “charter” or “no charter,” the county election commission shall cause to be held an election in the town or city, in the several wards thereof, if there are such wards, to ascertain the will of the people of the town or city, as to the surrender or nonsurrender of their charter. If the municipal corporation includes territory in two (2) or more counties, such election shall be called and conducted by the county election commissions of the counties in which the territory is situated, and the results certified to the county clerks of all such counties;

Notwithstanding subdivision (1), or § 6-52-205 to the contrary, no such petition shall be accepted nor election with respect to such question scheduled to be held by the county election commission of the county in which the town or city is located, unless two (2) years shall have expired from the date of the incorporation of the municipality or the date of the holding of the most recent election in the municipality on the question of “charter” or “no charter,” whichever shall have last occurred.

Acts 1901, ch. 165, § 1; Shan., § 1997a1; mod. Code 1932, § 3505; Acts 1959, ch. 295, § 8; 1968, ch. 436, § 1; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 7; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-219; T.C.A., § 6-2-501; Acts 1983, ch. 50, § 1.

Cross-References. Surrender of city manager charter, § 6-18-108.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

6-52-202. Notice of election.

Upon the receipt of such petition, the county election commission shall give notice of the time of holding such election, by written or printed handbills posted at five (5) or more public places in the town or city and every ward thereof, at least thirty (30) days before the day of election, stating the object of the election, and shall also cause the same to be published for two (2) consecutive weeks in some newspaper, if there is one published in the town or city.

Acts 1901, ch. 165, § 2; Shan., § 1997a2; Code 1932, § 3506; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-220; T.C.A., § 6-2-502; Acts 1980, ch. 676, § 1.

6-52-203. Conduct of election.

On the day fixed in the notices of election and at the usual place or places of holding elections in the town or city, the county election commission shall cause the elections to be held in the manner prescribed by law in cases of general election.

All persons who are entitled to vote in the town or city for officers thereof shall be entitled to vote in the election, and those who desire to surrender or abolish the charter shall have printed or written on their tickets the words “no charter,” and those opposed to the repeal or surrender of the charter shall have printed or written on their tickets the word “charter.”

Acts 1901, ch. 165, § 3; Shan., §§ 1997a3, 1997a4; mod. Code 1932, §§ 3507, 3508; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-221; T.C.A., § 6-2-503.

6-52-204. Return and canvass of election.

When the election is closed, the officers, judges and clerks holding the election shall certify the result of the election, together with the poll list of voters and ballots, and the same shall be duly returned to the county election commission, which shall canvass the ballots and verify the same as required by law in case of general elections.

Acts 1901, ch. 165, § 4; Shan., § 1997a5; mod. Code 1932, § 3509; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 7; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-222; T.C.A., § 6-2-504.

6-52-205. Results of election.

When the county election commission has duly canvassed the vote and the returns, and ascertained the result of the election, if it should appear that “no charter” has a majority of the votes cast, the county election commission shall make a triplicate certificate of the result of the election and file one (1) with the original petition with the county clerk; it shall also file one (1) of the certificates, together with a copy of the original petition, with the secretary of state, to be filed and recorded in the secretary of state's office; and it shall cause one (1) of the certificates to be registered in the register's office of the county in which the town or city is situated. When the certificates are duly filed and registered as provided in this subsection (a), the corporation shall be abolished and become extinct.

If a majority of the votes cast in the election are for “charter,” the county election commission shall make one (1) statement and certificate of the result, which it shall file with the county clerk of the county, together with the original petition. No other election shall be held for the repeal of the charter of such town or city until after the expiration of twelve (12) months.

Acts 1901, ch. 165, § 5; Shan., § 1997a6; Code 1932, § 3510; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 740, § 7; impl. am. Acts 1978, ch. 934, §§ 22, 36; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-223; T.C.A., § 6-2-505.

Cross-References. Liquidation of affairs, §§ 6-52-101 — 6-52-104.

6-52-206. Time for election.

Such an election will be held in conjunction with the next scheduled city or county-wide election, primary or referendum that is held forty-five (45) days after the petitions for abolition are filed with the election commission.

Acts 1901, ch. 165, § 6; Shan., § 1997a7; Code 1932, § 3511; T.C.A. (orig. ed.), § 6-224; T.C.A., § 6-2-506; Acts 1980, ch. 676, § 2.